New Jersey, session 222, A2181.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Commissioner of Health shall require every licensed physician or health care practitioner in the State providing perinatal care to a pregnant person or a person who has given birth, to refer the person for an endometriosis evaluation if the person has been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently shows symptoms of endometriosis. b. The Board of Medical Examiners shall require every obstetric care provider who is the primary caregiver for a pregnant person or a person who seeks perinatal care within six weeks of giving birth to, in accordance with nationally recognized guidelines: (1) provide the person with information, developed by the New Jersey Department of Health, on endometriosis and potential warning signs and symptoms; (2) inform the person of the benefits of being evaluated for endometriosis if the person has been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently shows symptoms of endometriosis; and (3) evaluate the person for endometriosis or refer the person to a qualified obstetric care provider for an endometriosis evaluation unless the person provides written refusal. c. The commissioner shall develop, in consultation with the Endometriosis Foundation of America and any other community-based organization as may be designated by the commissioner, educational information concerning endometriosis for pregnant individuals and individuals who have recently given birth and have been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently show symptoms of endometriosis.  The educational information provided shall include information on endometriosis and the potential warning signs and symptoms of endometriosis. d. Upon receipt of a referral for an endometriosis evaluation pursuant to subsection a. or b. of this section, the obstetric care provider shall perform an evaluation and discuss the results with the person and, if the person has a positive diagnosis of endometriosis, develop a treatment plan to minimize the persons risk from endometriosis. 2.  The Board of Medical Examiners, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.